Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 3
Duties and Liabilities of Trustees

§ 15-7-301. General duties not limited.

Except as specifically provided, the general duty of the trustee to administer a trust expeditiously for the benefit of the beneficiaries is not altered by this code.

§ 15-7-302. Trustee’s standard of care and performance.

Except as otherwise provided by the terms of the trust, the trustee shall observe the standards in dealing with the trust assets that would be observed by a prudent man dealing with the property of another, and if the trustee has special skills or is named trustee on the basis of representations of special skills or expertise, he is under a duty to use those skills.

§ 15-7-303. Duty to inform and account to beneficiaries.

The trustee shall keep the beneficiaries of the trust reasonably informed of the trust and its administration. In addition:

Within thirty (30) days after his acceptance of the trust, the trustee shall inform in writing the current beneficiaries and if possible, one (1) or more persons who under section 15-1-403[, Idaho Code,] of this code may represent beneficiaries with future interests, of the court in which the trust is registered and of his name and address.

Upon reasonable request, the trustee shall provide the beneficiary with a copy of the terms of the trust which describe or affect his interest and with relevant information about the assets of the trust and the particulars relating to the administration.

Upon reasonable request, a beneficiary is entitled to a statement of the accounts of the trust annually and on termination of the trust or change of the trustee.

§ 15-7-304. Duty to provide bond.

A trustee need not provide bond to secure performance of his duties unless required by the terms of the trust, reasonably requested by a beneficiary or found by the court to be necessary to protect the interests of the beneficiaries who are not able to protect themselves and whose interests otherwise are not adequately represented. On petition of the trustee or other interested person the court may excuse a requirement of bond, reduce the amount of the bond, release the surety, or permit the substitution of another bond with the same or different sureties. If bond is required, it shall be filed in the court of registration or other appropriate court in amounts and with sureties and liabilities as provided in sections 15-3-604 and 15-3-606[, Idaho Code,] of this code relating to bonds of personal representatives.

§ 15-7-305. Trustee’s duties — Appropriate place of administration — Deviation.

A trustee is under a continuing duty to administer the trust at a place appropriate to the purposes of the trust and to its sound, efficient management. If the principal place of administration becomes inappropriate for any reason, the court may enter any order furthering efficient administration and the interests of beneficiaries, including, if appropriate, release of registration, removal of the trustee and appointment of a trustee in another state. Trust provisions relating to the place of administration and to changes in the place of administration or of trustee control unless compliance would be contrary to efficient administration or the purposes of the trust. Views of adult beneficiaries shall be given weight in determining the suitability of the trustee and the place of administration.

§ 15-7-306. Personal liability of trustee to third parties.

Unless otherwise provided in the contract, a trustee is not personally liable on contracts properly entered into in his fiduciary capacity in the course of administration of the trust estate unless he fails to reveal his representative capacity and identify the trust estate in the contract.

A trustee is personally liable for obligations arising from ownership or control of property of the trust estate or for torts committed in the course of administration of the trust estate only if he is personally at fault.

Claims based on contracts entered into by a trustee in his fiduciary capacity, on obligations arising from ownership or control of the trust estate, or on torts committed in the course of trust administration may be asserted against the trust estate by proceeding against the trustee in his fiduciary capacity, whether or not the trustee is personally liable therefor.

The question of liability as between the trust estate and the trustee individually may be determined in a proceeding for accounting, surcharge or indemnification or other appropriate proceeding.

§ 15-7-307. Limitations on proceedings against trustees after final account.

Unless previously barred by adjudication, consent or limitation, any claim against a trustee for breach of trust is barred as to any beneficiary who has received a final account or other statement fully disclosing the matter and showing termination of the trust relationship between the trustee and the beneficiary unless a proceeding to assert the claim is commenced within six (6) months after receipt of the final account or statement. In any event and notwithstanding lack of full disclosure a trustee who has issued a final account or statement received by the beneficiary and has informed the beneficiary of the location and availability of records for his examination is protected after three (3) years. A beneficiary is deemed to have received a final account or statement if, being an adult, it is received by him personally or if, being a minor or disabled person, it is received by his representative as described in subsections (a)(1) and (2) [paragraphs (b)(1) and (2)] of section 15-1-403[, Idaho Code,] of this code.

§ 15-7-308. Removal of trustee.

A trustee may be removed in accordance with the terms of the trust or by the court on its own initiative or on petition of a trustor, cotrustee or beneficiary.

The court may remove a trustee or order other appropriate relief:

If the trustee has committed a material breach of trust;

If the trustee is unfit or unable to administer the trust;

If lack of cooperation among cotrustees substantially impairs the administration of the trust;

If the investment decisions of the trustee, although not constituting a breach of trust, have resulted in investment performance persistently and substantially below those of comparable trusts;

If, because of changed circumstances, removal of the trustee would substantially further the trustor’s purpose in creating the trust; or

For other good cause shown.

Pending a final decision on the petition to remove the trustee, the court may order such appropriate relief as may be necessary to protect the trust property or the interests of the beneficiaries.